Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,150
Authority to amend.

(MBCA 10.01) (a) A corporation
may amend its articles of incorporation at any time to add or change a provision
that is required or permitted in the articles of incorporation as of the effective
date of the amendment or to delete a provision that is not required to be
contained in the articles of incorporation.

(b) A shareholder of
the corporation does not have a vested property right resulting from any provision
in the articles of incorporation, including provisions relating to management,
control, capital structure, dividend entitlement, or purpose or duration of
the corporation.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 150.